Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 2
ANTIMONOPOLY FINANCING LAW

44-20-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, trustee, receiver, or assignee for the benefit of creditors.

"Sell", "sold", "buy", and "purchase" include exchange, barter, gift, and offer or contract to sell or buy.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 90, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-201 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-202. Exclusive finance agreements void - when.

It is unlawful for any person who is engaged, either directly or indirectly, in the manufacture or distribution of motor vehicles, to sell or enter into a contract to sell motor vehicles, whether patented or unpatented, to any person who is engaged or intends to engage in the business of selling the motor vehicles at retail in this state, on the condition or with an agreement or understanding, either express or implied, that the person so engaged in selling motor vehicles at retail in any manner shall finance the purchase or sale of any one or number of motor vehicles only with or through a designated person or class of persons or shall sell and assign the conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases arising from the sale of motor vehicles or any one or number thereof only to a designated person or class of persons, when the effect of the condition, agreement, or understanding so entered into may be to lessen or eliminate competition, or create or tend to create a monopoly in the person or class of persons who are designated, by virtue of the condition, agreement, or understanding to finance the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or to purchase conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases. Any such condition, agreement, or understanding is declared to be void and against the public policy of this state.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 90, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-202 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-203. Threat prima facie evidence of violation.

Any threat, expressed or implied, made directly or indirectly to any person engaged in the business of selling motor vehicles at retail in this state by any person engaged, either directly or indirectly, in the manufacture or distribution of motor vehicles, that the person will discontinue or cease to sell, or refuse to enter into a contract to sell, or will terminate a contract to sell motor vehicles, whether patented or unpatented, to the person who is so engaged in the business of selling motor vehicles at retail, unless the person finances the purchase or sale of any one or number of motor vehicles only with or through a designated person or class of persons or sells and assigns the conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases arising from his or her retail sales of motor vehicles or any one or number thereof only to a designated person or class of persons shall be prima facie evidence of the fact that the person so engaged in the manufacture or distribution of motor vehicles has sold or intends to sell the same on the condition or with the agreement or understanding prohibited in section 44-20-202.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 91, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-203 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-204. Threat by agent as evidence of violation.

Any threat, expressed or implied, made directly or indirectly to any person engaged in the business of selling motor vehicles at retail in this state by any person, or any agent of the person, who is engaged in the business of financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or of buying conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases on motor vehicles in this state and is affiliated with or controlled by any person engaged, directly or indirectly, in the manufacture or distribution of motor vehicles, that the person so engaged in the manufacture or distribution shall terminate his or her contract with or cease to sell motor vehicles to the person engaged in the sale of motor vehicles at retail in this state unless the person finances the purchase or sale of any one or number of motor vehicles only or through a designated person or class of persons or sells and assigns the conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases arising from his or her retail sale of motor vehicles or any one or number thereof only to the person so engaged in financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or in buying conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases on motor vehicles, shall be presumed to be made at the direction of and with the authority of the person so engaged in the manufacture or distribution of motor vehicles, and shall be prima facie evidence of the fact that the person so engaged in the manufacture or distribution of motor vehicles has sold or intends to sell the same on the condition or with the agreement or understanding prohibited in section 44-20-202.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 91, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-204 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-205. Offering consideration to eliminate competition.

It is unlawful for any person who is engaged, directly or indirectly, in the manufacture or wholesale distribution only of motor vehicles, whether patented or unpatented, to pay or give, or contract to pay or give, any thing or service of value to any person who is engaged in the business of financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or of buying conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail within this state if the effect of any such payment or the giving of any such thing or service of value may be to lessen or eliminate competition, or tend to create or create a monopoly in the person or class of persons who receive or accept the thing or service of value.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 91, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-205 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-206. Accepting consideration to eliminate competition.

It is unlawful for any person who is engaged in the business of financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or of buying conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail within this state to accept or receive, or contract or agree to accept or receive, either directly or indirectly, any payment, thing, or service of value from any person who is engaged, either directly or indirectly, in the manufacture of or wholesale distribution only of motor vehicles, whether patented or unpatented, if the effect of the acceptance or receipt of any such payment, thing, or service of value may be to lessen or eliminate competition, or to create or tend to create a monopoly in the person who accepts or receives such payment, thing, or service of value or contracts or agrees to accept or receive the same.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 92, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-206 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-207. Recipient of consideration shall not buy mortgages.

It is unlawful for any person who hereafter so accepts or receives, either directly or indirectly, any payment, thing, or service of value, as set forth in section 44-20-206, or contracts, either directly or indirectly, to receive any such payment, or thing, or service of value to thereafter finance or attempt to finance the purchase or sale of any motor vehicle or buy or attempt to buy any conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail in this state.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 92, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-207 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-208. Quo warranto action.

For a violation of any of the provisions of this part 2 by any corporation or association mentioned in this part 2, it is the duty of the attorney general or the district attorney of the proper county to institute proper suits or an action in the nature of quo warranto in any court of competent jurisdiction for the forfeiture of its charter rights, franchises, or privileges and powers exercised by such corporation or association, and for the dissolution of the same under the general statutes of the state.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 92, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-208 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-209. Violation by foreign corporation - penalty.

Every foreign corporation and every foreign association exercising any of the powers, franchises, or functions of a corporation in this state violating any of the provisions of this part 2 is denied the right and prohibited from doing any business in this state, and it is the duty of the attorney general to enforce this provision by bringing proper proceedings by injunction or otherwise. The secretary of state is authorized to revoke the license of any such corporation or association heretofore authorized to do business in this state.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 92, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-209 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-210. Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this part 2, any person who is a party to any agreement or understanding, or to any contract prescribing any condition, prohibited by this part 2, and any employee, agent, or officer of any such person who participates, in any manner, in making, executing, enforcing, or performing, or in urging, aiding, or abetting in the performance of, any such contract, condition, agreement, or understanding and any person who pays or gives or contracts to pay or give any thing or service of value prohibited by this part 2, and any person who receives or accepts or contracts to receive or accept any thing or service of value prohibited by this part 2 commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401. Each day's violation of this provision shall constitute a separate offense.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 92, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-210 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-211. Contract void.

Any contract or agreement in violation of the provisions of this part 2 shall be absolutely void and shall not be enforceable either in law or equity.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 93, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-211 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-212. Provisions cumulative.

The provisions of this part 2 shall be held cumulative of each other and of all other laws in any way affecting them now in force in this state.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 93, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-212 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-213. Damages.

In addition to the criminal and civil penalties provided in this part 2, any person who is injured in his or her business or property by any other person or corporation or association or partnership, by reason of any thing forbidden or declared to be unlawful by this part 2, may sue therefor in any court having jurisdiction thereof in the county where the defendant resides or is found, or any agent resides or is found, or where service may be obtained, without respect to the amount of controversy, and to recover twofold the damages sustained by him or her, and the costs of suit. When it appears to the court before which any proceedings under this part 2 are pending that the ends of justice require that other parties shall be brought before the court, the court may cause them to be made parties defendant and summoned, whether they reside in the county where such action is pending or not.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 93, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-213 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-214. Repeal of part.

This part 2 is repealed, effective September 1, 2027. Before its repeal, this part 2 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 93, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-214 as it existed prior to 2018.